District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Transparency Is Accountability Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Freedom of Information Act of 1976 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-
534(a)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (a)(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Information of a personal nature where the public disclosure thereof would constitute
a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, excluding audio or transcripts of calls to 911
and other 911 radio, including dispatches and agency to agency communications, where the 911
caller’s name and contact information has been redacted; provided, that the agency shall not
redact the personal information of the person requesting the record or a person who has expressly
consented to disclosure of the information in writing.”
(b) Paragraph (a)(4) is amended to read as follows
“(4) Inter-agency or intra-agency memorandums or letters, including memorandums or

letters generated or received by the staff or members of the Council, which would not be
available by law to a party other than a public body in litigation with the public body. This
exemption shall not apply to information regarding government misconduct, including actions,
policies, or decisions that violate the District’s Code of Conduct as defined by Section 101 of the
Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics
Reform Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Law 19-318; D.C. Official Code § 1–1161.01(7); the
District of Columbia Theft and White Collar Crimes Act of 1982 (D.C. Official Code Title 22,
Chapters 7, 24, 32); the Human Rights Act of 1977 (D.C. Law 2-38; D.C. Official Code §§ 2-
1401.01 et seq.); and Mayor’s Order 2023-131 (October 31, 2023) and any superseding order.”
(c) Subsection (b) is amended by:
(1) inserting the sentence “An agency shall withhold information under this
section only if the agency reasonably foresees that disclosure would harm an interest protected
by subsection (a).” before the word “Any”; and
(2) inserting the sentence “An agency shall apply a presumption of openness
when applying this section and shall consider discretionary releases of information when the
reasonable likelihood of significant harm occurring is low and the public interest in the
information is high.” after the phrase “where the deletion was made.”
(d) A new subsection (f) is inserted to read as follows:
“(f) Information withheld under the deliberative process privilege shall be disclosed if the
public’s interest in disclosure outweighs the District’s interest in secrecy.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,


approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.